3rdParty/snowball/algorithms/yiddish.sbl
        // -geliten => -layt
        'GE{Lamed}{Yud}{Tes}{Nun}' 
           ( <- '{Lamed}{TsveyYudn}{Tes}')

        // -gekliben => -klayb
        '{Kuf}{Lamed}{Yud}{Beys}{Nun}' 
           ( <- '{Kuf}{Lamed}{TsveyYudn}{Beys}')

        // -geriben => -rayb
        '{Reysh}{Yud}{Beys}{Nun}' 
           ( <- '{Reysh}{TsveyYudn}{Beys}')

        // -gerisen => -rays
        'GE{Reysh}{Yud}{Samekh}{Nun}' 
           ( <- '{Reysh}{TsveyYudn}{Samekh}')

        // -geshvigen => -shvayg
        '{Shin}{TsveyVovn}{Yud}{Giml}{Nun}' 
           ( <- '{Shin}{TsveyVovn}{TsveyYudn}{Giml}')

        // -geshmisen => -shmays
        '{Shin}{Mem}{Yud}{Samekh}{Nun}' 
           ( <- '{Shin}{Mem}{TsveyYudn}{Samekh}')

        // -geshniten => -shnayd
        '{Shin}{Nun}{Yud}{Tes}{Nun}' 
           ( <- '{Shin}{Nun}{TsveyYudn}{Dalet}')

        // -gebunden => -bind
        '{Beys}{Vov}{Nun}{Dalet}{Nun}' 
         ( <- '{Beys}{Yud}{Nun}{Dalet}')

        // -gevuntshn => -vintsh
        '{TsveyVovn}{Vov}{Tes}{Shin}{Nun}' 
         ( <- '{TsveyVovn}{Yud}{Tes}{Shin}')

        // -gezungen => -zing
        '{Zayen}{Vov}{Nun}{Giml}{Nun}' 
         ( <- '{Zayen}{Yud}{Nun}{Giml}')

        // -getrunken => -trink
        '{Tes}{Reysh}{Vov}{Nun}{Kuf}{Nun}' 
         ( <- '{Tes}{Reysh}{Yud}{Nun}{Kuf}')

        // -getsvungen => -tsving
        '{Tsadek}{TsveyVovn}{Vov}{Nun}{Giml}{Nun}' 
         ( <- '{Tsadek}{TsveyVovn}{Yud}{Nun}{Giml}')

        // -geshlungen => -shling
        '{Shin}{Lamed}{Vov}{Nun}{Giml}{Nun}' 
         ( <- '{Shin}{Lamed}{Yud}{Nun}{Giml}')

        // -geboygen => -beyg
        '{Beys}{VovYud}{Giml}{Nun}' 
         ( <- '{Beys}{TsveyYudn}{Giml}')

        // -gehoyben => -heyb
        '{Hey}{VovYud}{Beys}{Nun}' 
         ( <- '{Hey}{TsveyYudn}{Beys}')

        // -farloyren => -farlir
        '{Fey}{Alef}{Reysh}{Lamed}{VovYud}{Reysh}{Nun}' 
         ( <- '{Fey}{Alef}{Reysh}{Lamed}{Yud}{Reysh}')

        // -shtanen => -shtey
        '{Shin}{Tes}{Alef}{Nun}{Ayen}{Nun}' 
         ( <- '{Shin}{Tes}{TsveyYudn}')

         // -geshvoyrn => -shver
        '{Shin}{TsveyVovn}{VovYud}{Reysh}{Nun}' 
         ( <- '{Shin}{TsveyVovn}{Ayen}{Reysh}')

        // -(ge)brakht (shortened to -brakht after prefixes) => -breng
        '{Beys}{Reysh}{Alef}{Khof}{Tes}'
          (<- '{Beys}{Reysh}{Ayen}{Nun}{Giml}' )

        // ###### End of irregular past participles

        // Noun endings: -ung, -hayt, -kayt, -ikayt, -shaft
        '{Vov}{Nun}{Giml}' '{Hey}{TsveyYudn}{Tes}' '{Kuf}{TsveyYudn}{Tes}' '{Yud}{Kuf}{TsveyYudn}{Tes}' '{Shin}{Alef}{Fey}{Tes}'
          ( R1 delete )

        // Noun endings: -izm, izmen
        '{Yud}{Zayen}{Mem}' '{Yud}{Zayen}{Mem}{Ayen}{Nun}'
          ( R1 delete )

        // Plural ending: -im
        '{Yud}{Mem}'
          ( R1 delete )
          
        // Plural ending: -os (Hebraic), replace with -h
        '{Vov}{Sof}'
          ( R1  <- '{Hey}' )

        // Diminutive endings: -elekh, -ele, -lekh, -eles, -elen
        '{Ayen}{Lamed}{Ayen}{Khof}' '{Ayen}{Lamed}{Ayen}' '{Lamed}{Ayen}{Khof}' '{Ayen}{Lamed}{Ayen}{Samekh}' '{Ayen}{Lamed}{Ayen}{Nun}'
           ( R1 delete )
        
        // Noun ending: -ist
        '{Yud}{Samekh}{Tes}'
          (
            // Exceptions: -gist, -shist
            ( ('{Giml}' or '{Shin}') try (R1plus3 <- '{Yud}{Samekh}') )
            or
            ( R1 delete )
          )

        // Noun ending: -istn
        '{Yud}{Samekh}{Tes}{Nun}'
          ( R1 delete )
        
        // Verb ending: -stu
        '{Samekh}{Tes}{Vov}'
          ( R1 delete )

        // Superlative ending: -ster, -ste, -stn 
        '{Samekh}{Tes}{Ayen}{Reysh}' '{Samekh}{Tes}{Ayen}' '{Samekh}{Tes}{Nun}' 
          ( R1 delete )
          
        // Ambiguous verb ending: -st
        '{Samekh}{Tes}'
          ( R1 delete ) 
      )
    )

    do (
      [substring] among(
        // Noun endings: -ung, -hayt, -kayt, -ikayt, -shaft
        '{Vov}{Nun}{Giml}' '{Hey}{TsveyYudn}{Tes}' '{Kuf}{TsveyYudn}{Tes}' '{Yud}{Kuf}{TsveyYudn}{Tes}' '{Shin}{Alef}{Fey}{Tes}'
          ( R1 delete )

        // Diminutive endings: -l
        '{Lamed}'
          ( R1 consonant delete )
      )
    )

    do (
      [substring] among(
        // Adjective endings: -ig, -ik, -ish, -nik, -dik
        '{Yud}{Giml}' '{Yud}{Kuf}' '{Yud}{Shin}' '{Nun}{Yud}{Kuf}' '{Dalet}{Yud}{Kuf}'
          ( R1 delete )

        // Exceptions to above: -blik, -glik
        '{Beys}{Lamed}{Yud}{Kuf}' '{Giml}{Lamed}{Yud}{Kuf}'
          ( true )
          
        // Present participle endings: -ndik
        '{Nun}{Dalet}{Yud}{Kuf}'
           ( R1 delete )

        // Present participle ending -endik: delete if after a -ng, -nk, -n, -m, consonant+l, or vowel.
        // Otherwise, delete just the -ndik part.
        '{Ayen}{Nun}{Dalet}{Yud}{Kuf}'
           ( R1 delete )
      )
    )

    do (repeat goto ( ['GE' or 'TSU'] delete ))
  )
)

define stem as (
  do prelude
  do mark_regions
  backwards
    do standard_suffix
)
